North Dakota, session 69, SB2055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 27-20.2-23 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Unless a charge of delinquency is transferred for criminal prosecution under section
27-20.4-20 27 - 20.4 - 21 , the interest of national security requires, or the court otherwise orders
in the interest of the child, the law enforcement and correctional facility records and files of a
child alleged or found to be delinquent or in need of services or protection are not open to
public inspection; but inspection of these records and files is permitted by:
a. A juvenile court having the child before the court in any proceeding;
b. Counsel for a party to the proceeding;
c. The officers of public institutions or agencies to whom the child is or may be committed;
d. Law enforcement officers of other jurisdictions if necessary for the discharge of official
duties of the officers;
e. A court in which the child is convicted of a criminal offense for the purpose of a
presentence report or other dispositional proceeding, or by officials of correctional
facilities to which the child is detained or committed, or by the parole board, the governor,
or the pardon advisory board, if one has been appointed, in considering the child's parole
or discharge or in exercising supervision over the child;
f. The professional staff of the uniform crime victims compensation program if necessary
for the discharge of the duties of the professional staff pursuant to chapter 54-23.4; and
g. A superintendent, assistant superintendent, principal, or designee of the school in which
the child is currently enrolled or of a school in which the child wishes to enroll.

S. B. NO. 2055 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2055.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State